Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Chapter 3.4. Funding for State and Local Government Radiological Emergency Preparedness.

§ 44-146.31.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Department”
means the Department of Emergency Management.

“Nuclear power station”
means a facility producing electricity through the utilization of nuclear energy for sale to the public which is required to be licensed by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission and includes all units of the facility at a single site.

“Person”
means any individual, corporation, partnership, firm, association, trust, estate, public or private institution, group, agency, political subdivision or agency thereof, and any legal successor, representative, agent or agency of the foregoing.

History.

1982, c. 222; 2000, c. 309.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 substituted “Emergency Management” for “Emergency Services” in the paragraph defining “Department”; and arranged the terms alphabetically.

§ 44-146.32.
One-time and annual fees.

For each nuclear power station in commercial operation on July 1, 1982, the person owning the station shall pay to the Department, within ninety days of such date, a one-time fee of $55,000.

For each nuclear power station commencing commercial operation after July 1, 1982, the person owning the station shall pay to the Department a one-time fee of $55,000 not less than one year prior to the scheduled commencement of operation.

For each nuclear power station that on July 1 of each year is validly licensed to operate by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, the person owning the station shall pay to the Department not later than August 1 of that year an annual fee in an amount based upon the projected annual cost of administering the state and local governments’ radiological emergency preparedness programs for the station.

The Department shall send timely invoices for such fees to the persons responsible for their payment. However, failure of the Department to send the invoices in a timely manner shall not relieve the responsible persons of their obligation to pay such fees.

History.

1982, c. 222; 1984, c. 322; 1988, c. 56.

§ 44-146.33.
Radiological Emergency Preparedness Fund.

All moneys received by the Department under this chapter shall be deposited in the state treasury and set apart in a special fund to be known as the “Radiological Emergency Preparedness Fund.” Moneys deposited in this fund shall be expended by the Department to the extent appropriated only to support the activities of state agencies and the local governments in establishing, maintaining and operating such emergency plans, programs and capabilities to deal with nuclear accidents as are required by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission and the Federal Emergency Management Agency with respect to nuclear power stations.

History.

1982, c. 222.